Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 2 The Administration of the State System of Education at the State Level

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2015, ch. 30, amending this Chapter, states in relevant part: “..in accordance with
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 (Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014”.

Laws 2015, ch. 179, amending this Chapter, states in relevant part : “..conforming
Wyoming Statute to Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).”

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Education Code of 1969,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 59 to 79.

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty as applied to school officers, 18 ALR2d 268.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 74 to 92.